Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.580

Official controls—Public hearing by commission.

Before recommending an official control or amendment to the board for adoption, the commission shall hold at least one public hearing.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.580. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 58.]